Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.037

Application and renewal fees.

In accordance with RCW 43.135.055, the department may annually increase application and renewal fees as necessary to recover the cost of implementing the administrative and disciplinary provisions of chapter 134, Laws of 2008.

[ 2008 c 285 s 13.]

NOTES:

Intent—Captions not law—Effective date—2008 c 285: See notes following RCW 43.22.434.